Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4207
Nebraska Children's Commission; report; hearing.

The Nebraska Children's Commission shall annually provide a written report to the Governor and an electronic report to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature defining its strategic child welfare priorities and progress toward addressing such priorities, summarizing reports from each committee and subcommittee of the commission, and making recommendations on or before September 1 of each year. The commission shall present a summary of such report in an annual public hearing before the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature on or before December 1 of each year.

Laws 2012, LB821, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB87, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB732, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB600, § 8.